Maryland, session 2025, HB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–803.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) through [(5)] (6) of this
subsection, if, on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, a local authority
determines that any maximum speed limit specified in this subtitle is greater or less than
reasonable or safe under existing conditions on any part of a highway in its jurisdiction, it
may establish a reasonable and safe maximum speed limit for that part of the highway,
which may:
(i) Decrease the limit at an intersection;
(ii) Increase the limit in an urban district to not more than 50 miles
per hour;
(iii) Decrease the limit in an urban district; or
(iv) Decrease the limit outside an urban district to not less than 25
miles per hour.
(2) An engineering and traffic investigation is not required to conform a
posted maximum speed limit in effect on December 31, 1974, to a different limit specified
in § 21–801.1(b) of this subtitle.
– 1 –

Ch. 557 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Calvert County may decrease the maximum speed limit to not less than
15 miles per hour on Lore Road and, except for Solomons Island Road, each highway south
of Lore Road without performing an engineering and traffic investigation, regardless of
whether the highway is inside an urban district.
(4) (i) This paragraph applies only to:
1. Anne Arundel County and Montgomery County; and
2. Municipalities located in Anne Arundel County and
Montgomery County.
(ii) A local authority may decrease the maximum speed limit to not
less than 15 miles per hour on a highway only after performing an engineering and traffic
investigation.
(iii) A local authority may not implement a new speed monitoring
system to enforce speed limits on any portion of a highway for which the speed limit has
been decreased under this paragraph.
(5) Baltimore City may, without performing an engineering and traffic
investigation:
(i) Decrease the maximum speed limit on a highway under its
jurisdiction; or
(ii) Increase to a previously established level the maximum speed
limit on a highway under its jurisdiction.
(6) A MUNICIPALITY LOCATED IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY MAY
DECREASE THE MAXIMUM SPEED LIMIT TO NOT LESS THAN 15 MILES PER HOUR ON
A HIGHWAY WITHOUT PERFORMING AN ENGINEERING AND TRAFFIC
INVESTIGATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –